Missouri, session 2026, SB1172.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 171 and 173, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 171.200
and 173.1551, to read as follows:
171.200. 1. This section and section 173.1551 shall
be known and may be cited as the "Cronkite New Voices Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "School-sponsored media", any material that is
prepared, substantially written, published, or broadcast by
a student journalist at a public high school; distributed or
generally made available to members of the student body; and
prepared under the direction of a student-media advisor.
"School-sponsored media" does not include any media intended
for distribution or transmission solely in the classroom in
which the media is produced;
(2) "Student journalist", a public high school student
who gathers, compiles, writes, edits, photographs, records,
produces, or prepares content for dissemination in school-
sponsored media;

SB 1172 2
(3) "Student-media advisor", an individual employed,
appointed, or designated by a school district to supervise
or provide instruction relating to school-sponsored media.
3. Subject to the provisions of this section, the
freedom of the press in school-sponsored media shall be
protected. A student journalist has the right to exercise
freedom of speech and of the press in school-sponsored
media. Material in school-sponsored media shall not be
suppressed solely because it involves political or
controversial subject matter.
4. School districts and student-media advisors may
regulate the number, length, frequency, and format of school-
sponsored media. Review of material prepared for school-
sponsored media and encouragement of the expression of such
material in a manner that is consistent with professional
standards of English and journalism shall not be deemed to
be or construed as an abridgement of the right to freedom of
expression in school-sponsored media or a restraint on
publication of the material therein.
5. A school district shall not authorize any prior
restraint of any school-sponsored media except if the
administration or student-media advisor reasonably
determines or anticipates that the media:
(1) Is libelous or slanderous;
(2) Constitutes an invasion of privacy;
(3) Violates federal or state law;
(4) Is a threat of violence;
(5) Advertises a product or service that is illegal or
is not permitted to be sold to minors by law;
(6) Violates the rights of others;
(7) Is likely to incite students to commit an unlawful
act or to violate school district policy or procedure; or

SB 1172 3
(8) Is likely to materially and substantially disrupt
or interfere with the orderly operation of the school.
6. Subject to the limitations imposed by this section,
student journalists are responsible for determining the
news, opinion, and advertising content of school-sponsored
media. Student-media advisors are responsible for teaching
and encouraging free and responsible expression of material
and professional standards of English and journalism. No
student-media advisor shall be disciplined, terminated from
employment, transferred, or relieved of duties imposed under
this subsection for refusal to abridge or infringe upon the
right to freedom of expression conferred by this section.
7. No publication or other expression of matter by
students in the exercise of rights under this section shall
be deemed to be an expression of a school district's
policy. No school district, member of the board of
education, student-media advisor, or employee of a school
district shall be held liable in any civil or criminal
action for any publication or other expression of matter by
student journalists in the exercise of rights under this
section except to the extent that such persons or entities
actively participated in the conduct that is the subject of
the civil or criminal action or knew of the conduct and
failed to take timely action to prevent or withdraw such
publication or expression that is the subject of the civil
or criminal action. A student journalist who has attained
the age of majority may be held liable in any civil or
criminal action for material expressed in student
publications to the extent of such student journalist’s
responsibility for and involvement in the preparation and
publication of such matter.

SB 1172 4
8. Each school district shall adopt a written policy
regarding the freedom of the press and expression by
students in accordance with this section. The policy shall
include reasonable provisions for the time, place, and
manner of student expression. The policy may also include
limitations regarding language that may be defined as
vulgar, obscene, offensively lewd, profane, harassing,
threatening, or intimidating.
173.1551. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "School-sponsored media", any material that is
prepared, substantially written, published, or broadcast by
a student journalist at a public institution of higher
education in this state; distributed or generally made
available to members of the student body; and prepared under
the direction of a student-media advisor. "School-sponsored
media" does not include any media intended for distribution
or transmission solely in the classroom in which the media
is produced;
(2) "Student journalist", a student of a public
institution of higher education who gathers, compiles,
writes, edits, photographs, records, produces, or prepares
content for dissemination in school-sponsored media;
(3) "Student-media advisor", an individual employed,
appointed, or designated by a public institution of higher
education in this state to supervise or provide instruction
relating to school-sponsored media.
2. Subject to the provisions of this section, the
freedom of the press in school-sponsored media shall be
protected. A student journalist has the right to exercise
freedom of speech and of the press in school-sponsored
media. Material in school-sponsored media shall not be

SB 1172 5
suppressed solely because it involves political or
controversial subject matter.
3. Subject to subsection 4 of this section, a student
journalist is responsible for determining the news, opinion,
feature, and advertising content of school-sponsored media.
This subsection shall not be construed to prevent a student-
media advisor from teaching professional standards of
English and journalism to student journalists.
4. This section does not authorize or protect
expression by a student that:
(1) Is libelous or slanderous;
(2) Constitutes an invasion of privacy;
(3) Violates federal or state law;
(4) Is likely to incite students to commit an unlawful
act or to violate institution policy or procedure; or
(5) Is likely to materially and substantially disrupt
or interfere with the orderly operation of the institution.
5. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section,
a student journalist at a public institution of higher
education in this state shall not be disciplined for
exercising such student journalist's freedom of expression
in school-sponsored media.
6. A student-media advisor at a public institution of
higher education in this state shall not be dismissed,
suspended, disciplined, reassigned, transferred, or
otherwise retaliated against for protecting or refusing to
infringe on the rights of student journalists outlined in
this section.
7. No publication or other expression of matter by
students in the exercise of rights under this section shall
be deemed to be an expression of an institution's policy.
No public institution of higher education or member of the

SB 1172 6
institution's governing body or employee thereof shall be
held liable in any civil or criminal action for any
publication or other expression of matter by student
journalists in the exercise of rights under this section
except to the extent that such persons or entities actively
participated in the conduct that is the subject of the civil
or criminal action.
✓